District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.32

Limitations on the District’s opportunity to purchase.

(a)

The District’s opportunity to purchase shall be subordinate to the right of a tenant.

(b)

To exercise its right under this subchapter, the Mayor shall provide a written statement of interest to the owner and tenant within 30 days of the Mayor’s receipt of the copy of offer of sale required by § 42-3404.03.

(c)

(1)

The Mayor shall not exercise the opportunity to purchase provided by this subchapter unless at least 25% of the rental units in the housing accommodation are affordable units.

(2)

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “affordable unit” means a rental unit in a housing accommodation for which the existing monthly rent, including utilities, paid by the tenant is equal to or less than 30% of the monthly income of a household with an income of 50% of the area median income, as set forth in the periodic calculation provided by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, adjusted for the household size.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 432
as added Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-286, § 2, 55 DCR 11989

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3404.33 and § 42-3404.34.